src/morphology/affixes/noun.lexc
LEXICON k29 ! tráður

+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUMLr S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k30 ! fótur
k30e ;
k_flt30 ;

LEXICON  k30e 
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt30
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLNOM_UR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLACC_UR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k31 ! veggur
k31e ;
k_flt31 ;

LEXICON k31e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt31
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc:j S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:j S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k32 ! ryggur
k31e ;
#+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
#+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
#+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
#+N+Msc:j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

k_flt31 ;
#+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
#+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
#+N+Msc:j S_M_PLDAT ;
#+N+Msc:j S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k33 ! hylur
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k34 ! drongur
k34e ;
k_flt34 ;

LEXICON k34e
+N+Msc:%^EIO S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt34
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k35 ! bonkur
+N+Msc:%^EIO S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k36 ! heyggjur
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S_M_SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k37 ! skógvur
k37e ;
k_flt37 ;

LEXICON k37e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^GVDEL S_M_SGGEN ;


LEXICON k_flt37 
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^GVDEL S_M_PLDATm ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k38 ! bógvur
k38e ;
k_flt38 ;

LEXICON k38e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^VDEL S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt38
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k39 ! sjógvur
k39e ;
k_flt39 ;

LEXICON k39e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_2 ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc:%^GVDEL S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt39
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k40 ! hógvur
k40e ;
k_flt40 ;

LEXICON k40e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S_M_SGGEN;

LEXICON k_flt40
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k41 ! maður
k41e ;
k_flt41 ;

LEXICON k41e
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom:maður DF_N_SGm ;
             :mann k41_obl ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Dat:monn%>u DF_D_PL ;

LEXICON k41_obl
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt41
+N+Msc:menn S_M_PLNOM_NULL_I_IR ;
+N+Msc:menn S_M_PLACC_NULL_I_IR ;
+N+Msc:mann S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k42 ! dagur
k42e ;
k_flt42 ;

LEXICON k42e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt42
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k43 ! faðir
k43e ;
k_flt43 ;

LEXICON k43e
!+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
!+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
!+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
!+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

+N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
+N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt43
!+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLNOM ;
!+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLACC ;
!+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLDAT ;
!+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLGEN ;

+N+Msc:fedr S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:fedr S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:fedr S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:fedr S_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k44 ! bróðir, stem is bróð
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom:ir DF_N_SGm ;
            :ur k44_obl ;

LEXICON k44_obl
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_NULL ;
k_flt44 ;

LEXICON k_flt44f
k_flt44 ;

LEXICON k_flt44
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLACC_NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^IUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^IUML S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k45 ! spónur
k45e ;
k_flt45 ;

LEXICON k45e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt45
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k46 ! fjørður ! XXX start her.
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k47 ! sonur
k47e ;
k_flt47 ;

LEXICON k47e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt47
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k48 ! hamar
k48e ;
k_flt48 ;

LEXICON k48e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt48
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k49 ! verkur
k49e ;
k_flt49 ;

LEXICON k49e
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt49
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k50 ! skjøldur (non_poetic)
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k51 ! luður
+N+Msc:ð S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:nn S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:nn S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:nn S_M_SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:nn S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:nn S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:nn S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:nn S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k52 ! primus
k52e ;
k_flt52 ;

LEXICON k52e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt52
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k53 ! aðal
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;


! Feminines
! __________

LEXICON kv1/2
kv1 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv1/6f
kv1 ;
kv6 ;

LEXICON kv1 ! genta
kv1e ;
kv_flt1 ;

LEXICON kv1e
+N+Fem: W_F_SGNOM ;
+N+Fem: W_F_SGOBL ;

LEXICON kv_flt1
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_UR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv2/22
kv2 ;
kv22 ;


LEXICON kv2/6
kv2 ;
kv6 ;

LEXICON kv2/27
kv2 ;
kv27 ;

LEXICON kv2/3
kv2 ;
kv3 ;

LEXICON kv2e/17e
kv2e ;
kv17e ;

LEXICON kv2 ! bygd
kv2e ;
kv_flt2 ;

LEXICON kv_bd2e
kv2e ;

LEXICON kv2e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt2
+N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem: F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv3/2
kv3 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv3/5
kv3 ;
kv5 ;

LEXICON kv3/7
kv3 ;
kv7 ;

LEXICON kv3 ! søgn
kv3e ;
kv_flt3 ;

LEXICON kv3e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt3 
+N+Fem:%^OEA F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:      F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F_PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv4 ! fonn
kv4e ;
kv_flt4 ;

LEXICON kv4e
+N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt4
+N+Fem:%^OA F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem:     F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OA F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv5 ! øld
kv5e ;
kv_flt5 ;

LEXICON kv5e
+N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt5
+N+Fem:      F_PLNA_IR ;
+N+Fem:      F_PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F_PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv6/2
kv6 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv6 ! ár
kv6e ;
kv_flt6 ;
