src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
hegrafótur:hegrafót k30 ;
slíðrafótur:slíðrafót k30 ;
alfaðir:al k43e;
arbeiðsond kv4e ;
blóðverkur:blóðverkj k49 ;
borðfótur:borðfót k30 ;
borðskomm kv4e ;
brimreið kv2e/17e ;
brunaøld kv5e ;
budingsaftan k53 ;
bógleggur:bóglegg k31 ;
bógvur:bógv k38 ;
dagur:dag k42 ;
djúprødd:djúprødd kv3/2 ;
drekkamuður:drekkamu k51 ;
dreyibonkur:dreyibeink k35 ;
drøgg kv3e ;
dunnuhylur:dunnuhyl k33 ;
eirishvonn kv4 ;
erma kv1/6f ;
eygnaverkur:eygnaverkj k49 ;
eysrúmsbekkur:eysrúmsbekk k32 ;
eysturlega:eysturleg kv1e ;
felagsformaður:felagsfor k41 ;
festarmoy kv6 ;
fingrafjøl kv3/7 ;
fjallarøð kv3/5 ;
fjørður:fjørð k46 ;
fles kv6/2 ;
flogleið kv2 ;
fosturbróðir:fosturbróð k44 ;
fosturfaðir k43 ;
framsøgn kv3 ;
framvongur:framveing k34 ;
fyglingartíð kv2e ;
fótleggur:fótlegg k31 ;
gagguskógvur:gagguskógv k37 ;
gamalseyðabógvur:gamalseyðabógv k38 ;
geldskúgvur:geldskúgv k40 ;
gerandisdagur:gerandisdag k42 ;
glatanarsonur:glatanarson k47 ;
glæra:glær kv1 ;
gorrus k52 ;
grasjørð kv3e ;
greipingartráður:greipingartráð k29 ;
grátrødd kv5 ;
gudfaðir k43e;
hamar k48 ;
harmarødd kv5 ;
heilsulæra:heilsulær kv1e ;
hellurøð kv3/5 ;
hemar k48 ;
herskjøldur k50 ;
húsaskjøldur k50 ;
snibbaskjøldur k50 ;
heyggjur:heyggj k36 ;
hurðarrás kv2/27 ;
hvannafótur:hvannafót k30 ;
hvonn kv4 ;
hvønndagsmaður:hvønndags k41 ;
hárógv kv2/22 ;
høggaspónur:høggaspón k45 ;
høggispónur:høggispón k45 ;
hølvispónur:hølvispón k45 ;
hørg kv5e ;
húðarskógvur:húðarskógv k37 ;
hýsugruður:hýsugru k51 ;
innkrevjing kv6 ;
innsjógvur:innsjógv k39 ;
innskotsryggur:innskotsrygg k32 ;
iðranargrein kv6/2 ;
jarnbreyt kv2 ;
jóansøkuaftan k53 ;
jólaheilsa(n) kv1/2 ;
jørð kv3 ;
kaffikvørn kv2/3 ;
kassafjøl kv3/7 ;
kirkjufaðir k43 ;
kjøtkvørn kv2/3 ;
klappus k52 ;
klinkhamar k48 ;
knappholstráður:knappholstráð k29 ;
kombikshylur:kombikshyl k33 ;
korðvongur:korðveing k34 ;
kreymaverkur:kreymaverkj k49 ;
krian kv2e ;
kvinnubonkur:kvinnubeink k35 ;
kvørn kv2/3 ;
kyrrufjørður:kyrrufjørð k46 ;
lagsbróðir:lagsbróð k44 ;
lambsbógvur:lambsbógv k38 ;
landaskomm kv4e ;
langabbasonur:langabbason k47 ;
langleggur:langlegg k31 ;
liggingarhøna:liggingarhøn kv1 ;
limadagur:limadag k42 ;
lomvigarás kv2/27 ;
loynistíggjur:loynistíggj k36 ;
lítlasponn kv4 ;
men kv2/6 ;
metingarmaður:metingar k41 ;
meyrus k52 ;
mikkjalsmessuaftan k53 ;
minning kv6 ;
mittfjørður:mittfjørð k46 ;
miðaløld kv5e ;
miðleið kv2 ;
mjóryggur:mjórygg k32 ;
morbróðir:morbróð k44 ;
mykineskyrra:mykineskyrr kv1e ;
málsgrein kv6/2 ;
nalvastrongur:nalvastreing k34 ;
náttartøgn kv3e ;
piparkvørn kv2/3 ;
pjankus k52e ;
prentus k52 ;
prestsonur:prestson k47 ;
pufferma kv1/6f ;
píkatráður:píkatráð k29 ;
pípustúgvur:pípustúgv k40 ;
rakaskógvur:rakaskógv k37 ;
reið kv2e/17e ;
ringreið kv2e ;
ringrás kv2/27 ;
rossatrøð kv3 ;
ryggverkur:ryggverkj k49 ;
rødd kv5 ;
røð kv3/5 ;
sandheyggjur:sandheyggj k36 ;
seglbonkur:seglbeink k35 ;
seingjarfjøl kv3/7 ;
sekkur:sekk k31 ;
sigluhespa:sigluhesp kv1 ;
sjúkravitjan kv2 ;
skalving kv6 ;
skarnsmuður:skarnsmu k51 ;
skaðasjógvur:skaðasjógv k39 ;
skeggmaður:skegg k41 ;
skerpibógvur:skerpibógv k38 ;
skriftafaðir k43 ;
skúgvur:skúgv k40 ;
skúmfonn kv4 ;
skúvhamar k48 ;
smaludrongur:smaludreing k34 ;
spikseil kv6/2 ;
spreingirás kv2/27 ;
starvsbróðir:starvsbróð k44 ;
steinøld kv5e ;
stovningardagur:stovningardag k42 ;
streymfjørður:streymfjørð k46 ;
streymnýtsla:streymnýtsl kv1e ;
stóriryggur:stórirygg k32 ;
stórsjógvur:stórsjógv k39 ;
summarmálaaftan k53 ;
sveiptráður:sveiptráð k29 ;
svimjihylur:svimjihyl k33 ;
svøvnbonkur:svøvnbeink k35 ;
sáðjørð kv3e ;
talrøð kv3/5 ;
telgispónur:telgispón k45 ;
tubbaksneyð kv2e ;
tváttarbjørn kv3 ;
tvørfótur:tvørfót k30 ;
tórshamar k48e ;
ullarstúka:ullarstúk kv1 ;
vaskifjøl kv3/7 ;
verfaðir k43 ;
versonur:verson k47 ;
viljaveggur:viljavegg k31 ;
vælindisskógvur:vælindisskógv k37 ;
yvirmuður:yvirmu k51 ;
yvirtráður:yvirtráð k29 ;
friðarskjøldur k50 ;
snórhógvur:snórhógv2 k40 ;
áarhylur:áarhyl k33 ;
álvheyggjur:álvheyggj k36 ;
ónsdagur:ónsdag k42 ;
øld kv5 ;
úlvasjógvur:úlvasjógv k39 ;
